Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2626.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 46, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 46-812, to read: START_STATUTE46-812. Child care workforce scholarship program A. The department shall Establish a child care workforce scholarship program to provide a scholarship to an INDIVIDUAL who is BELOW eighty-five percent of the state median income and who is any of the following: 1. a teacher, educator, assistant or support staff of a department-contracted child care provider. 2. a district employee of a preschool program. 3. a district employee of a kindergarten program. 4. a district employee of any of grades one through twelve. B. A person who is selected to receive a scholarship under this section shall use the monies only for department-contracted child care providers and the department shall pay the department-contracted child care providers directly. C. The department shall disperse monies when the department receives the monies on a first-come, first-served basis. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; department of economic security; child care workforce scholarship program; exemption A. The sum of $200,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security for the child care workforce scholarship program established pursuant to section 46-812, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.